Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
ARTICLE 4
REGULATION OF VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC

Cross references:

For exemption of members of the military forces from traffic regulation, see § 28-3-504; for disposition of fines and penalties under this article, see § 42-1-217; for crimes that involve the operation of motor vehicles, also see §§ 18-3-106, 18-3-205, 18-4-409, 18-4-512, 18-9-107, and 18-9-114 to 18-9-116.5.

Section

PART 1 TRAFFIC REGULATION - GENERALLY

PART 2 EQUIPMENT

PART 3 EMISSIONS INSPECTION

PART 4 DIESEL INSPECTION PROGRAM

PART 5 SIZE - WEIGHT - LOAD

PART 6 SIGNALS - SIGNS - MARKINGS

PART 7 RIGHTS-OF-WAY

PART 8 PEDESTRIANS

PART 9 TURNING - STOPPING

PART 10 DRIVING - OVERTAKING - PASSING

PART 11 SPEED REGULATIONS

PART 12 PARKING

PART 13 ALCOHOL AND DRUG OFFENSES

PART 14 OTHER OFFENSES

PART 15 MOTORCYCLES

PART 16 ACCIDENTS AND ACCIDENT REPORTS

PART 17 PENALTIES AND PROCEDURE

PART 18 VEHICLES ABANDONED ON PUBLIC PROPERTY

PART 19 SCHOOL BUS REQUIREMENTS

PART 20 HOURS OF SERVICE

PART 21 VEHICLES ABANDONED ON PRIVATE PROPERTY

PART 22 RECYCLING MOTOR VEHICLES

PART 23 EDUCATION REGARDING USE OF NONMOTORIZED WHEELED TRANSPORTATION BY MINORS

PART 24 EVENT DATA RECORDERS